Washington statutes.
RCW 27.20.030

Library part of judicial branch.

The state law library shall be a part of the judicial branch of state government and shall be under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the supreme court.

[ 1959 c 188 s 1.]

NOTES:

Committee abolished: "The state law library committee is hereby abolished." [ 1959 c 188 s 5.] Provisions relating to the state law library committee were formerly codified in chapter 43.36 RCW but were repealed by 1959 c 188 s 6.